California statutes. Evidence Code
======================================================================
  Evidence Code
  State of California
======================================================================

Source: Official California Legislative Information
        https://downloads.leginfo.legislature.ca.gov/
Extracted: April 27, 2026


======================================================================



======================================================================

DIVISION 1. PRELIMINARY PROVISIONS AND CONSTRUCTION [1. - 12.]

1.

This code shall be known as the Evidence Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

2.

The rule of the common law, that statutes in derogation thereof are to be strictly construed, has no application to this code. This code establishes the law of this state respecting the subject to which it relates, and its provisions are to be liberally construed with a view to effecting its objects and promoting justice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

3.

If any provision or clause of this code or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the code which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this code are declared to be severable.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

4.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, these preliminary provisions and rules of construction shall govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

5.

Division, chapter, article, and section headings do not in any manner affect the scope, meaning, or intent of the provisions of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

6.

Whenever any reference is made to any portion of this code or of any other statute, such reference shall apply to all amendments and additions heretofore or hereafter made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

7.

Unless otherwise expressly stated:

(a) “Division” means a division of this code.

(b) “Chapter” means a chapter of the division in which that term occurs.

(c) “Article” means an article of the chapter in which that term occurs.

(d) “Section” means a section of this code.

(e) “Subdivision” means a subdivision of the
 section in which that term occurs.

(f) “Paragraph” means a paragraph of the subdivision in which that term occurs.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

8.

The present tense includes the past and future tenses; and the future, the present.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

9.

The masculine gender includes the feminine and neuter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

10.

The singular number includes the plural; and the plural, the singular.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

11.

“Shall” is mandatory and “may” is permissive.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

12.

(a) This code shall become operative on January 1, 1967, and shall govern proceedings in actions brought on or after that date and, except as provided in subdivision (b), further proceedings in actions pending on that date.

(b) Subject to subdivision (c), a trial commenced before January 1, 1967, shall not be governed by this code. For the purpose of this subdivision:

(1) A trial is commenced when the first witness is sworn or the first exhibit is admitted into evidence and is
 terminated when the issue upon which such evidence is received is submitted to the trier of fact. A new trial, or a separate trial of a different issue, commenced on or after January 1, 1967, shall be governed by this code.

(2) If an appeal is taken from a ruling made at a trial commenced before January 1, 1967, the appellate court shall apply the law applicable at the time of the commencement of the trial.

(c) The provisions of Division 8 (commencing with Section 900) relating to privileges shall govern any claim of privilege made after December 31, 1966.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 2. WORDS AND PHRASES DEFINED [100. - 260.]

100.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, these definitions govern the construction of this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

105.

“Action” includes a civil action and a criminal action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

110.

“Burden of producing evidence” means the obligation of a party to introduce evidence sufficient to avoid a ruling against him on the issue.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

115.

“Burden of proof” means the obligation of a party to establish by evidence a requisite degree of belief concerning a fact in the mind of the trier of fact or the court. The burden of proof may require a party to raise a reasonable doubt concerning the existence or nonexistence of a fact or that he establish the existence or nonexistence of a fact by a preponderance of the evidence, by clear and convincing proof, or by proof beyond a reasonable doubt.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the burden of proof requires proof by a preponderance of the evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

120.

“Civil action” includes civil proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

125.

“Conduct” includes all active and passive behavior, both verbal and nonverbal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

130.

“Criminal action” includes criminal proceedings.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

“Declarant” is a person who makes a statement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

140.

“Evidence” means testimony, writings, material objects, or other things presented to the senses that are offered to prove the existence or nonexistence of a fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

145.

“The hearing” means the hearing at which a question under this code arises, and not some earlier or later hearing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

150.

“Hearsay evidence” is defined in Section 1200.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

160.

“Law” includes constitutional, statutory, and decisional law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

165.

“Oath” includes affirmation or declaration under penalty of perjury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

170.

“Perceive” means to acquire knowledge through one’s senses.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

175.

“Person” includes a natural person, firm, association, organization, partnership, business trust, corporation, limited liability company, or public entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

177.

“Dependent person” means a person, regardless of whether the person lives independently, who has a physical or mental impairment that substantially restricts his or her ability to carry out normal activities or to protect his or her rights, including, but not limited to, persons who have physical or developmental disabilities or whose physical or mental abilities have significantly diminished because of age. “Dependent person” includes any person who is admitted as an inpatient to a 24-hour health facility, as defined in Sections 1250, 1250.2, and 1250.3 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 70, Sec. 1.   (AB 1934)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

180.

“Personal property” includes money, goods, chattels, things in action, and evidences of debt.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

185.

“Property” includes both real and personal property.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

190.

“Proof” is the establishment by evidence of a requisite degree of belief concerning a fact in the mind of the trier of fact or the court.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

195.

“Public employee” means an officer, agent, or employee of a public entity.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

200.

“Public entity” includes a nation, state, county, city and county, city, district, public authority, public agency, or any other political subdivision or public corporation, whether foreign or domestic.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

“Real property” includes lands, tenements, and hereditaments.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

“Relevant evidence” means evidence, including evidence relevant to the credibility of a witness or hearsay declarant, having any tendency in reason to prove or disprove any disputed fact that is of consequence to the determination of the action.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

215.

“Spouse” includes “registered domestic partner,” as required by Section 297.5 of the Family Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 32.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

220.

“State” means the State of California, unless applied to the different parts of the United States. In the latter case, it includes any state, district, commonwealth, territory, or insular possession of the United States.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

225.

“Statement” means (a) oral or written verbal expression or (b) nonverbal conduct of a person intended by him as a substitute for oral or written verbal expression.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

230.

“Statute” includes a treaty and a constitutional provision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

235.

“Trier of fact” includes (a) the jury and (b) the court when the court is trying an issue of fact other than one relating to the admissibility of evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

240.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), “unavailable as a witness” means that the declarant is any of the following:

(1) Exempted or precluded on the ground of privilege from testifying concerning the matter to which his or her statement is relevant.

(2) Disqualified from testifying to the matter.

(3) Dead or unable to attend or to testify at the hearing because of then-existing physical or mental illness or infirmity.

(4) Absent from the hearing and the court is unable to compel
 his or her attendance by its process.

(5) Absent from the hearing and the proponent of his or her statement has exercised reasonable diligence but has been unable to procure his or her attendance by the court’s process.

(6) Persistent in refusing to testify concerning the subject matter of the declarant’s statement despite having been found in contempt for refusal to testify.

(b) A declarant is not unavailable as a witness if the exemption, preclusion, disqualification, death, inability, or absence of the declarant was brought about by the procurement or wrongdoing of the proponent of his or her statement for the purpose of preventing the declarant from attending or testifying.

(c) Expert testimony that establishes that physical or mental trauma
 resulting from an alleged crime has caused harm to a witness of sufficient severity that the witness is physically unable to testify or is unable to testify without suffering substantial trauma may constitute a sufficient showing of unavailability pursuant to paragraph (3) of subdivision (a). As used in this section, the term “expert” means a physician and surgeon, including a psychiatrist, or any person described by subdivision (b), (c), or (e) of Section 1010.

The introduction of evidence to establish the unavailability of a witness under this subdivision shall not be deemed procurement of unavailability, in absence of proof to the contrary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   (AB 1723)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

250.

“Writing” means handwriting, typewriting, printing, photostating, photographing, photocopying, transmitting by electronic mail or facsimile, and every other means of recording upon any tangible thing, any form of communication or representation, including letters, words, pictures, sounds, or symbols, or combinations thereof, and any record thereby created, regardless of the manner in which the record has been stored.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 945, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

255.

“Original” means the writing itself or any counterpart intended to have the same effect by a person executing or issuing it. An “original” of a photograph includes the negative or any print therefrom. If data are stored in a computer or similar device, any printout or other output readable by sight, shown to reflect the data accurately, is an “original.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------

260.

A “duplicate” is a counterpart produced by the same impression as the original, or from the same matrix, or by means of photography, including enlargements and miniatures, or by mechanical or electronic rerecording, or by chemical reproduction, or by other equivalent technique which accurately reproduces the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 708.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 3. GENERAL PROVISIONS [300. - 413.]



CHAPTER 1. Applicability of Code [300. - 300.]

300.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, this code applies in every action before the Supreme Court or a court of appeal or superior court, including proceedings in such actions conducted by a referee, court commissioner, or similar officer, but does not apply in grand jury proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 101.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Province of Court and Jury [310. - 312.]

310.

(a) All questions of law (including but not limited to questions concerning the construction of statutes and other writings, the admissibility of evidence, and other rules of evidence) are to be decided by the court. Determination of issues of fact preliminary to the admission of evidence are to be decided by the court as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 400) of Chapter 4. 

(b) Determination of the law of an organization of nations or of the law of a foreign nation or a public entity in a foreign nation is a question of law to be determined in the manner provided in Division 4 (commencing with Section 450).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

311.

If the law of an organization of nations, a foreign nation or a state other than this state, or a public entity in a foreign nation or a state other than this state, is applicable and such law cannot be determined, the court may, as the ends of justice require, either:

(a) Apply the law of this state if the court can do so consistently with the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of this state; or

(b) Dismiss the action without prejudice or, in the case of a reviewing court, remand the case to the trial court with directions to dismiss the action without prejudice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

312.

Except as otherwise provided by law, where the trial is by jury:

(a) All questions of fact are to be decided by the jury.

(b) Subject to the control of the court, the jury is to determine the effect and value of the evidence addressed to it, including the credibility of witnesses and hearsay declarants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Order of Proof [320. - 320.]

320.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the court in its discretion shall regulate the order of proof.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Admitting and Excluding Evidence [350. - 406.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [350. - 356.]

350.

No evidence is admissible except relevant evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

351.

Except as otherwise provided by statute, all relevant evidence is admissible.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

351.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the results of a polygraph examination, the opinion of a polygraph examiner, or any reference to an offer to take, failure to take, or taking of a polygraph examination, shall not be admitted into evidence in any criminal proceeding, including pretrial and post conviction motions and hearings, or in any trial or hearing of a juvenile for a criminal offense, whether heard in juvenile or adult court, unless all parties stipulate to the admission of such results.

(b) Nothing in this section is intended to exclude from evidence statements made during a polygraph examination which are otherwise admissible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 202, Sec. 1.   Effective July 12, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

351.2.

(a) In a civil action for personal injury or wrongful death, evidence of a person’s immigration status shall not be admitted into evidence, nor shall discovery into a person’s immigration status be permitted.

(b) This section does not affect the standards of relevance, admissibility, or discovery prescribed by Section 3339 of the Civil Code, Section 7285 of the Government Code, Section 24000 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 1171.5 of the Labor
 Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 132, Sec. 1.   (AB 2159)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

351.3.

(a) In a civil action not governed by Section 351.2, evidence of a person’s immigration status shall not be disclosed in open court by a party or their attorney unless the judge presiding over the matter first determines that the evidence is admissible in an in camera hearing requested by the party seeking disclosure of the person’s immigration status.

(b) This section does not do any of the following:

(1) Apply to cases in which a person’s immigration status is necessary to prove an element of a claim or an affirmative defense.

(2) Impact otherwise applicable laws governing the relevance of immigration status to
 liability or the standards applicable to inquiries regarding immigration status in discovery or proceedings in a civil action, including Section 3339 of the Civil Code, Section 7285 of the Government Code, Section 24000 of the Health and Safety Code, and Section 1171.5 of the Labor Code.

(3) Prohibit a person or their attorney from voluntarily revealing the person’s immigration status to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (SB 836)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

351.4.

(a) In a criminal action, evidence of a person’s immigration status shall not be disclosed in open court by a party or their attorney unless the judge presiding over the matter first determines that the evidence is admissible in an in camera hearing requested by the party seeking disclosure of the person’s immigration status.

(b) This section does not do any of the following:

(1) Apply to cases in which a person’s immigration status is necessary to prove an element of an offense or an affirmative defense.

(2) Limit discovery in a criminal action.

(3) Prohibit a person or their attorney from voluntarily revealing the person’s immigration status to the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 168, Sec. 2.   (SB 836)   Effective August 22, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

352.

The court in its discretion may exclude evidence if its probative value is substantially outweighed by the probability that its admission will (a) necessitate undue consumption of time or (b) create substantial danger of undue prejudice, of confusing the issues, or of misleading the jury.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

352.1.

In any criminal proceeding under Section 261, 262, or 264.1, subdivision (d) of Section 286, or subdivision (d) of Section 287 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code, or in any criminal proceeding under subdivision (c) of Section 286 or subdivision (c) of Section 287 of, or former Section 288a of, the Penal Code in which the defendant is alleged to have compelled the
 participation of the victim by force, violence, duress, menace, or threat of great bodily harm, the district attorney may, upon written motion with notice to the defendant or the defendant’s attorney, if he or she is represented by an attorney, within a reasonable time prior to any hearing, move to exclude from evidence the current address and telephone number of any victim at the hearing.

The court may order that evidence of the victim’s current address and telephone number be excluded from any hearings conducted pursuant to the criminal proceeding if the court finds that the probative value of the evidence is outweighed by the creation of substantial danger to the victim.

Nothing in this section shall abridge or limit the defendant’s right to discover or investigate the
 information.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 423, Sec. 18.   (SB 1494)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

352.2.

(a) In any criminal proceeding where a party seeks to admit as evidence a form of creative expression, the court, while balancing the probative value of that evidence against the substantial danger of undue prejudice under Section 352, shall consider, in addition to the factors listed in Section 352, that: (1) the probative value of such expression for its literal truth or as a truthful narrative is minimal unless that expression is created near in time to the charged crime or crimes, bears a sufficient level of similarity to the charged crime or crimes, or includes factual detail not otherwise publicly available; and (2) undue prejudice includes, but is not limited to, the possibility that the trier of fact will, in violation
 of Section 1101, treat the expression as evidence of the defendant’s propensity for violence or general criminal disposition as well as the possibility that the evidence will explicitly or implicitly inject racial bias into the proceedings.

(b) If proffered and relevant to the issues in the case, the court shall consider the following as well as any additional relevant evidence offered by either party:

(1) Credible testimony on the genre of creative expression as to the social or cultural context, rules, conventions, and artistic techniques of the expression.

(2) Experimental or social science research demonstrating that the introduction of a particular type of expression explicitly or implicitly introduces racial bias into the proceedings.

(3) Evidence to rebut such research or testimony.

(c) For purposes of this section, “creative expression” means the expression or application of creativity or imagination in the production or arrangement of forms, sounds, words, movements, or symbols, including, but not limited to, music, dance, performance art, visual art,
 poetry, literature, film, and other such objects or media.

(d) The question of the admissibility of a form of creative expression shall be heard in limine and determined by the court, outside the presence and hearing of the jury, pursuant to Section 402. The court shall state on the record its ruling and its reasons therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 973, Sec. 2.   (AB 2799)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

A verdict or finding shall not be set aside, nor shall the judgment or decision based thereon be reversed, by reason of the erroneous admission of evidence unless:

(a) There appears of record an objection to or a motion to exclude or to strike the evidence that was timely made and so stated as to make clear the specific ground of the objection or motion; and

(b) The court which passes upon the effect of the error or errors is of the opinion that the admitted evidence should have been excluded on the ground stated and that the error or errors complained of resulted in a miscarriage of justice.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

A verdict or finding shall not be set aside, nor shall the judgment or decision based thereon be reversed, by reason of the erroneous exclusion of evidence unless the court which passes upon the effect of the error or errors is of the opinion that the error or errors complained of resulted in a miscarriage of justice and it appears of record that:

(a) The substance, purpose, and relevance of the excluded evidence was made known to the court by the questions asked, an offer of proof, or by any other means;

(b) The rulings of the court made compliance with subdivision (a) futile; or 

(c) The evidence was sought by questions asked during cross-examination or recross-examination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

When evidence is admissible as to one party or for one purpose and is inadmissible as to another party or for another purpose, the court upon request shall restrict the evidence to its proper scope and instruct the jury accordingly.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

Where part of an act, declaration, conversation, or writing is given in evidence by one party, the whole on the same subject may be inquired into by an adverse party; when a letter is read, the answer may be given; and when a detached act, declaration, conversation, or writing is given in evidence, any other act, declaration, conversation, or writing which is necessary to make it understood may also be given in evidence.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Preliminary Determinations on Admissibility of Evidence [400. - 406.]

400.

As used in this article, “preliminary fact” means a fact upon the existence or nonexistence of which depends the admissibility or inadmissibility of evidence. The phrase “the admissibility or inadmissibility of evidence” includes the qualification or disqualification of a person to be a witness and the existence or nonexistence of a privilege.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

As used in this article, “proffered evidence” means evidence, the admissibility or inadmissibility of which is dependent upon the existence or nonexistence of a preliminary fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

(a) When the existence of a preliminary fact is disputed, its existence or nonexistence shall be determined as provided in this article.

(b) The court may hear and determine the question of the admissibility of evidence out of the presence or hearing of the jury; but in a criminal action, the court shall hear and determine the question of the admissibility of a confession or admission of the defendant out of the presence and hearing of the jury if any party so requests.

(c) A ruling on the admissibility of evidence implies whatever finding of fact is prerequisite thereto; a separate or formal finding is unnecessary unless required by statute.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

(a) The proponent of the proffered evidence has the burden of producing evidence as to the existence of the preliminary fact, and the proffered evidence is inadmissible unless the court finds that there is evidence sufficient to sustain a finding of the existence of the preliminary fact, when:

(1) The relevance of the proffered evidence depends on the existence of the preliminary fact;

(2) The preliminary fact is the personal knowledge of a witness concerning the subject matter of his testimony;

(3) The preliminary fact is the authenticity of a writing; or

(4) The proffered evidence is of a statement or other conduct of a particular person and the preliminary fact is whether that person made the statement or so conducted himself.

(b) Subject to Section 702, the court may admit conditionally the proffered evidence under this section, subject to evidence of the preliminary fact being supplied later in the course of the trial.

(c) If the court admits the proffered evidence under this section, the court: 

(1) May, and on request shall, instruct the jury to determine whether the preliminary fact exists and to disregard the proffered evidence unless the jury finds that the preliminary fact does exist.

(2) Shall instruct the jury to disregard the proffered evidence if the court subsequently determines that a jury could not reasonably find that the preliminary fact exists.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

Whenever the proffered evidence is claimed to be privileged under Section 940, the person claiming the privilege has the burden of showing that the proffered evidence might tend to incriminate him; and the proffered evidence is inadmissible unless it clearly appears to the court that the proffered evidence cannot possibly have a tendency to incriminate the person claiming the privilege.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

With respect to preliminary fact determinations not governed by Section 403 or 404:

(a) When the existence of a preliminary fact is disputed, the court shall indicate which party has the burden of producing evidence and the burden of proof on the issue as implied by the rule of law under which the question arises. The court shall determine the existence or nonexistence of the preliminary fact and shall admit or exclude the proffered evidence as required by the rule of law under which the question arises.

(b) If a preliminary fact is also a fact in issue in the action:

(1) The jury shall not be informed of the court’s determination as to the existence or nonexistence of the preliminary fact.

(2) If the proffered evidence is admitted, the jury shall not be instructed to disregard the evidence if its determination of the fact differs from the court’s determination of the preliminary fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

This article does not limit the right of a party to introduce before the trier of fact evidence relevant to weight or credibility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Weight of Evidence Generally [410. - 413.]

410.

As used in this chapter, “direct evidence” means evidence that directly proves a fact, without an inference or presumption, and which in itself, if true, conclusively establishes that fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

411.

Except where additional evidence is required by statute, the direct evidence of one witness who is entitled to full credit is sufficient for proof of any fact.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

412.

If weaker and less satisfactory evidence is offered when it was within the power of the party to produce stronger and more satisfactory evidence, the evidence offered should be viewed with distrust.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

413.

In determining what inferences to draw from the evidence or facts in the case against a party, the trier of fact may consider, among other things, the party’s failure to explain or to deny by his testimony such evidence or facts in the case against him, or his willful suppression of evidence relating thereto, if such be the case.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. JUDICIAL NOTICE [450. - 460.]

450.

Judicial notice may not be taken of any matter unless authorized or required by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

451.

Judicial notice shall be taken of the following:

(a) The decisional, constitutional, and public statutory law of this state and of the United States and the provisions of any charter described in Section 3, 4, or 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution.

(b) Any matter made a subject of judicial notice by Section 11343.6, 11344.6, or 18576 of the Government Code or by Section 1507 of Title 44 of the United States Code.

(c) Rules of professional conduct for members of the bar adopted pursuant to Section 6076 of the Business and Professions Code and rules of practice and procedure for the courts of this state adopted by the Judicial Council.

(d) Rules of pleading, practice, and procedure prescribed by the United States Supreme Court, such as the Rules of the United States Supreme Court, the Federal Rules of Civil Procedure, the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, the Admiralty Rules, the Rules of the Court of Claims, the Rules of the Customs Court, and the General Orders and Forms in Bankruptcy.

(e) The true signification of all English words and phrases and of all legal expressions.

(f) Facts and propositions of generalized knowledge that are so universally known that they cannot reasonably be the subject of dispute.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 248, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

452.

Judicial notice may be taken of the following matters to the extent that they are not embraced within Section 451:

(a) The decisional, constitutional, and statutory law of any state of the United States and the resolutions and private acts of the Congress of the United States and of the Legislature of this state.

(b) Regulations and legislative enactments issued by or under the authority of the United States or any public entity in the United States.

(c) Official acts of the legislative, executive, and judicial departments of the United States and of any state of the United States.

(d) Records of (1) any court of this state or (2) any court of record of the United States or of any state of the United States.

(e) Rules of court of (1) any court of this state or (2) any court of record of the United States or of any state of the United States.

(f) The law of an organization of nations and of foreign nations and public entities in foreign nations.

(g) Facts and propositions that are of such common knowledge within the territorial jurisdiction of the court that they cannot reasonably be the subject of dispute.

(h) Facts and propositions that are not reasonably subject to dispute and are capable of immediate and accurate determination by resort to sources of reasonably indisputable accuracy.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

452.5.

(a) The official acts and records specified in subdivisions (c) and (d) of Section 452 include any computer-generated official court records, as specified by the Judicial Council, that relate to criminal convictions, when the record is certified by a clerk of the superior court pursuant to Section 69844.5 of the Government Code at the time of computer entry.

(b) (1) An official record of conviction certified in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1530, or an electronically digitized copy thereof, is admissible under Section 1280 to prove the commission, attempted commission, or solicitation of a criminal offense, prior conviction, service of a prison term, or other act, condition, or event recorded by the record.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “electronically digitized copy” means a copy that is made by scanning, photographing, or otherwise exactly reproducing a document, is stored or maintained in a digitized format, and meets either of the following requirements:

(A) The copy bears an electronic signature or watermark unique to the entity responsible for certifying the document.

(B) The copied document is an official record of conviction, certified in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 1530, that is transmitted by the clerk of the superior court in a manner showing that the copy was prepared and transmitted by that clerk of the superior court. A seal, signature, or other indicia of the court shall constitute adequate showing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 55.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

453.

The trial court shall take judicial notice of any matter specified in Section 452 if a party requests it and:

(a) Gives each adverse party sufficient notice of the request, through the pleadings or otherwise, to enable such adverse party to prepare to meet the request; and

(b) Furnishes the court with sufficient information to enable it to take judicial notice of the matter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

454.

(a) In determining the propriety of taking judicial notice of a matter, or the tenor thereof:

(1) Any source of pertinent information, including the advice of persons learned in the subject matter, may be consulted or used, whether or not furnished by a party.

(2) Exclusionary rules of evidence do not apply except for Section 352 and the rules of privilege.

(b) Where the subject of judicial notice is the law of an organization of nations, a foreign nation, or a public entity in a foreign nation and the court resorts to the advice of persons learned in the subject matter, such advice, if not received in open court, shall be in writing.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1965, Ch. 299.)
-------------------------------------------

455.

With respect to any matter specified in Section 452 or in subdivision (f) of Section 451 that is of substantial consequence to the determination of the action:
